apertium-yua.yua.lexc
LEXICON SpanishNouns
cuchara%<n%>%<barb%>:cuchara NounEndings ; ! cuchara
vecina%<n%>%<barb%>:vecina NounEndings ; ! cuchara
òorah%<n%>%<barb%>:òorah NounEndings ; ! hora
polvio%<n%>%<barb%>:polvio NounEndings ; ! maquillaje
ìingles%<n%>%<barb%>:ìingles NounEndings ; ! inglés
dyaas%<n%>%<barb%>:dyaas # ; ! días
cinco%<n%>%<barb%>:cinco # ; ! cinco

LEXICON ProperNoun
cancún%<propn%>:cancún NounEndings; ! Cancún
cancun%<propn%>:cancun NounEndings; ! Cancún
chichén%<propn%>:chichén NounEndings ; ! Chichén itza
isma%<propn%>:isma NounEndings; ! Isma (name)
hoʼ%<propn%>:hoʼ NounEndings; ! ho
chicago%<propn%>:chicago NounEndings; ! chicago
pisté%<propn%>:pisté NounEndings ; ! pisté
pisté%<propn%>:pʼisteʼ NounEndings ; ! piste
pisté%<propn%>:pʼisté NounEndings ; ! piste
tikul%<propn%>:tikul NounEndings ; ! tical

dios%<propn%>:dios NounEndings; ! dios 
dios%<propn%>:dyòos NounEndings; ! dios
pil%<propn%>:pil NounEndings; ! pil (name)
tony%<propn%>:Tony NounEndings; ! tony (name)
doña%<propn%>:doña NounEndings; ! doña
jacinta%<propn%>:jacinta NounEndings; ! jacinta (name)
goyo%<propn%>:goyo NounEndings; ! jacinta (name)
màaya%<propn%>:màaya NounEndings ; ! maya
felipe%<propn%>:felipe NounEndings ; ! felipe
sarah%<propn%>:sarah NounEndings ; ! sarah
laura%<propn%>:laura NounEndings ; ! laura
martina%<propn%>:martina NounEndings ; ! martina
espita%<propn%>:espita NounEndings ; ! name
alejandra%<propn%>:alejandra NounEndings ; ! name
bolles%<propn%>:bolles NounEndings ; ! name
teodosio%<propn%>:teodosio NounEndings ; ! name
tujin%<propn%>:tujin NounEndings ; ! name
khan%<propn%>:khan NounEndings ; ! name

xpil%<propn%>:xpil NounEndings ; ! xpil. TODO support x- as prefix

zaci%<propn%>:zaci NounEndings ; ! zaci
tomas%<propn%>:tomas NounEndings ; ! tomas
carmen%<propn%>:carmen NounEndings ; ! carmen
julia%<propn%>:julia NounEndings ; ! julia
fidelia%<propn%>:fidelia NounEndings ; ! fidelia
yu%<propn%>:yu NounEndings ; ! Yu (surname)

chʼochʼ%<n%>:chʼochʼ NounEndings ; ! cigarra
chʼochʼlin%<n%>:chʼochʼlin NounEndings ; ! cigarra

síinik%<n%>:síinik NounEndings ; ! hormiga

íicham%<n%>:íicham NounEndings ; ! esposo
íicham%<n%>:icham NounEndings ; ! esposo

LEXICON IrregularParadigms
ko’oten%<v%>%<iv%>%<s_2sg%>:ko’oten # ; ! imperative of tàal
ko’oten%<v%>%<iv%>%<s_2pl%>:ko’oten%>e’ex # ; ! imperative of tàal


LEXICON IrregularIntransVerb
xíimbal%<v%>%<iv%>:xíimbal TransVozAntipasiva ; !caminar
xíimbal%<v%>%<tv%>:xíimba%{l%}%>t TransVozActiva ; !visitar

yàan%<v%>%<iv%>:yàan IntransitiveSetB ; ! existir
yàan%<v%>%<iv%>:yaan IntransitiveSetB ; ! existir


LEXICON IrregularTransVerb

púut%<v%>%<tv%>:púut TransVozActiva ;
púut%<v%>%<tv%>:púut TransVozAntipasiva ;
púut%<v%>%<tv%>:púut IrregularTransVozPasiva ;
! to know (conocer)
kʼahóol%<v%>%<tv%>:kʼahóol TransitiveSetB ;
kʼahóol%<v%>%<tv%>:kʼahóo%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;

! to know (saber)
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:oheel TransitiveSetB ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:ohel TransitiveSetB ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:ohee%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:ohe%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;

! to know (saber), alternativa
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:òoheel TransitiveSetB ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:òohel TransitiveSetB ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:òohee%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;
oheel%<v%>%<tv%>:òohe%{l%}%>t RegIntransDvT ;

! see
il%<v%>%<tv%>:il TransVozActiva ;
il%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ilah TransVozAntipasiva ;
il%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:il IrregularTransVozPasiva ;

! hear/feel
uʼuy%<v%>%<tv%>:uʼuy TransVozActiva ;
uʼuy%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:uʼuyah TransVozAntipasiva ;
uʼuy%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:uʼuy IrregularTransVozPasiva ;

! The ʼbʼ is only used in the 3rd person....should I add the tag for subj_num=3?
uʼub%<v%>%<tv%>:uʼub TransVozActiva ;
uʼub%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:uʼubah TransVozAntipasiva ;
uʼub%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:uʼub IrregularTransVozPasiva ;

! say
aʼal%<v%>%<tv%>:aʼal TransVozActiva ;
aʼal%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:aʼalah TransVozAntipasiva ;
aʼal%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:aʼal IrregularTransVozPasiva ;

! Ask
kʼáat%<v%>%<tv%>:kʼáat TransVozActiva ;
kʼáat%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:kʼáat TransVozAntipasiva ;
kʼáat%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:kʼeáat TransVozPasiva ;

! Lend
páay%<v%>%<tv%>:páay TransVozActiva ;
páay%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:páay TransVozAntipasiva ;
páay%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:páay IrregularTransVozPasiva ;


LEXICON PositionalInflections
%<ipfv%>:%>t%>al PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<pfv%>:%>l%>ah IntransitiveSetB ;
%<pf%>:%>l%>ahaʼan IntransitiveSetB ;
%<subj%>:%>l%>ak IntransitiveSetB ;
%<imp%>:%>en IntransitiveSetB ;

LEXICON Positionals
! pucker
bochʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:bochʼ PositionalInflections ;

! stoop, squat, crouch, cower (lower eyes)
motʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:motʼ PositionalInflections ;

! compress, reduce
tsʼan%<v%>%<pos%>:tsʼan PositionalInflections ;

! gather, crease
muchʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:muchʼ PositionalInflections ;

! punch, puncture, bore
tsʼop%<v%>%<pos%>:tsʼop PositionalInflections ;

! pile up, gather (pile up earth, bury)
mul%<v%>%<pos%>:mul PositionalInflections ;

! thrust into a hole
tsʼot%<v%>%<pos%>:tsʼot PositionalInflections ;

! lean against (limit, stop)
nak%<v%>%<pos%>:nak PositionalInflections ;

! sit cross-legged (squash)
tsʼuk%<v%>%<pos%>:tsʼuk PositionalInflections ;

! join, unit
nuch%<v%>%<pos%>:nuch PositionalInflections ;

! bow, grovel (bend)
chin%<v%>%<pos%>:chin PositionalInflections ;

! stare
pʼich%<v%>%<pos%>:pʼich PositionalInflections ;

! pin, fix or set in place
chʼik%<v%>%<pos%>:chʼik PositionalInflections ;

! jump, protrude (jump, leap)
pʼit%<v%>%<pos%>:pʼit PositionalInflections ;

! scatter, stretch out (spread extend)
hay%<v%>%<pos%>:hay PositionalInflections ;

! bend
pʼok%<v%>%<pos%>:pʼok PositionalInflections ;

! straddle, mount (mount)
hek%<v%>%<pos%>:hek PositionalInflections ;

! swell up (swell, inflate, develop)
pʼol%<v%>%<pos%>:pʼol PositionalInflections ;

! sink, insert (insert, encircle)
hup%<v%>%<pos%>:hup PositionalInflections ;

! reside
kah%<v%>%<pos%>:kah PositionalInflections ;

! lean, bend
pʼus%<v%>%<pos%>:pʼus PositionalInflections ;

! place between two (same) things
kap%<v%>%<pos%>:kap PositionalInflections ;

! open, open wide (open, cut open)
xel%<v%>%<pos%>:xel PositionalInflections ;

! roll up, curl up, coil up (roll, twist, wind)
kotsʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:kotsʼ PositionalInflections ;

! open  (open, spread/extend, try for first time; e.g., xeen a xit a wiit/go open your anus for 1st time!)
xit%<v%>%<pos%>:xit PositionalInflections ;

! roll up, twist oneself, fold oneself up (roll, twist, screw)
kop%<v%>%<pos%>:kop PositionalInflections ;

! open, come out, appear (unfold, spread, open as in hand, legs, etc.)
xitʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:xitʼ PositionalInflections ;

! lie athwart, block
kʼat%<v%>%<pos%>:kʼat PositionalInflections ;

! stick to, adhere (fasten, stick to, adhere)
takʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:takʼ PositionalInflections ;

! lean (bend, tilt)
kʼeb%<v%>%<pos%>:kʼeb PositionalInflections ;

! protrude (raise over oneʼs head)
tichʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:tichʼ PositionalInflections ;

! put between two things
lap%<v%>%<pos%>:lap PositionalInflections ;

! bulge, knot (twist, sprain, dislocate)
tukʼ%<v%>%<pos%>:tukʼ PositionalInflections ;

! join, unit
lot%<v%>%<pos%>:lot PositionalInflections ;

! distend, stick out, lie with stomach sticking out (protrude, inflate)
tʼes%<v%>%<pos%>:tʼes PositionalInflections ;

! bend, arch (bend, twist)
met%<v%>%<pos%>:met PositionalInflections ;

! sit
kul%<v%>%<pos%>:kul PositionalInflections ;

! tener vida
kux%<v%>%<pos%>:kux PositionalInflections ;

! expose, extend, tighten (extend, tighten)
tʼin%<v%>%<pos%>:tʼin PositionalInflections ;

! fold hands
moch%<v%>%<pos%>:moch PositionalInflections ;

! ball up, bulge (form ball, make round)
wol%<v%>%<pos%>:wol PositionalInflections ;

! submerge (sink, immerse, dip)
tʼub%<v%>%<pos%>:tʼub PositionalInflections ;

! hang down something gelatinous (drop hand)
tʼoy%<v%>%<pos%>:tʼoy PositionalInflections ;


LEXICON AdjectivalEndings
PluralSubjSuffix ;
Terminatives ;

LEXICON Adjectives
al%<adj%>:al AdjectivalEndings ;
mehen%<adj%>:mehen AdjectivalEndings ;
mehentak%<adj%>:mehentak AdjectivalEndings ;
pochón%<adj%>%<barb%>:pochon AdjectivalEndings ; ! Dir/LR
pochón%<adj%>%<barb%>:pochón AdjectivalEndings ;
kʼaʼam%<adj%>:kʼaʼam AdjectivalEndings ;
takʼan%<adj%>:takʼan AdjectivalEndings ;
úuchben%<adj%>:úuchben AdjectivalEndings ;
maʼalob%<adj%>:maʼalob AdjectivalEndings ;
tsʼáamal%<adj%>:tsʼáamal AdjectivalEndings ; 
kiʼimak%<adj%>:kiʼimak AdjectivalEndings ;
óotsil%<adj%>:óotsil AdjectivalEndings ;
kohaʼan%<adj%>:kohaʼan AdjectivalEndings ;
wiʼih%<adj%>:wiʼih AdjectivalEndings ;
uts%<adj%>:uts AdjectivalEndings ;
màas%<adj%>:màas AdjectivalEndings ;
xàan%<adj%>:xàan AdjectivalEndings ;
yàan%<adj%>:yàan AdjectivalEndings ;
yáax%<adj%>:yáax AdjectivalEndings ;
yaʼax%<adj%>:yaʼax AdjectivalEndings ;
nohoch%<adj%>:nohoch AdjectivalEndings ;
koʼoh%<adj%>:koʼoh AdjectivalEndings ;
páah%<adj%>:páah AdjectivalEndings ;
káah%<adj%>:káah AdjectivalEndings ;
kʼabéet%<adj%>:kʼabéet AdjectivalEndings ;
kʼaʼnaʼan%<adj%>:kʼaʼanaʼan AdjectivalEndings ;
yaʼab%<adj%>:yaʼab AdjectivalEndings ;
kʼaʼam%<adj%>:kʼaʼam AdjectivalEndings ;
kiʼichpam%<adj%>:kiʼichpam AdjectivalEndings ;
chichan%<adj%>:chichan AdjectivalEndings ;
chan%<adj%>:chan AdjectivalEndings ;
túumben%<adj%>:túumben AdjectivalEndings ;
nàatsʼ%<adj%>:nàatsʼ AdjectivalEndings ;
